Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3331
State Treasurer; transfer of funds.

The State Treasurer shall transfer any funds remaining in or accruing to the Soybean Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund on or after October 1, 1995, to the private nonprofit corporation. Such transfers shall be in payment of any contract between the Soybean Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board and the corporation which provides for the corporation to carry out the responsibilities and programs of the board under the Nebraska Soybean Resources Act. The State Treasurer shall make such transfers only if sections 2-3326 to 2-3328 have been complied with.

Laws 1995, LB 434, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 692, § 2.